zh-TW: 是否隨附鼓皮: 包含打擊面鼓皮; 包含雙面鼓皮; 不含鼓皮; 包含共鳴面鼓皮; 其他
tr: Davul derisi dahildir: Vurma derisi dahil; Her iki deri dahil; Deri dahil değil; Rezonans derisi dahil; Diğer
hr-HR: Uključena membrana za bubanj: Uključena udarna opna; Uključene obje opne; Opne nisu uključene; Uključena rezonantna opna; Ostalo
da: Trommeskind, der er inkluderet: Slagskind medfølger; Begge skind medfølger; Skind medfølger ikke; Resonansskind medfølger; Andet
en: Drum head included: Batter head included; Both heads included; No heads included; Resonant head included; Other
hu: Dobfej mellékelve: Ütőbőr mellékelve; Mindkét bőr mellékelve; Bőrök nélkül; Rezonánsbőr mellékelve; Egyéb
lt-LT: Įtraukta būgno membrana: Pridedamas mušamasis plastikas; Pridedami abu plastikai; Plastikai nepridedami; Pridedamas rezonansinis plastikas; Kita
el: Περιλαμβάνεται κεφαλή τυμπάνου: Περιλαμβάνεται μεμβράνη κρούσης; Περιλαμβάνονται και οι δύο μεμβράνες; Δεν περιλαμβάνονται μεμβράνες; Περιλαμβάνεται μεμβράνη συντονισμού; Άλλο
vi: Mặt trống đi kèm: Kèm mặt gõ; Kèm cả hai mặt; Không kèm mặt trống; Kèm mặt cộng hưởng; Khác
fr: Peau de tambour incluse: Peau de frappe incluse; Deux peaux incluses; Aucune peau incluse; Peau de résonance incluse; Autre
fi: Mukana tuleva rumpukalvo: Sisältää lyöntikalvon; Sisältää molemmat kalvot; Ei sisällä kalvoja; Sisältää resonanssikalvon; Muu
zh-CN: 包含鼓皮: 包含打击面鼓皮; 包含双面鼓皮; 不含鼓皮; 包含共鸣面鼓皮; 其他
pt-PT: Pele de tambor incluída: Pele batedeira incluída; Ambas as peles incluídas; Nenhuma pele incluída; Pele ressonante incluída; Outro
ru: Барабанные кожи в комплекте: Ударная мембрана в комплекте; Обе мембраны в комплекте; Мембраны не входят в комплект; Резонансная мембрана в комплекте; Другое
it: Pelle del tamburo inclusa: Pelle battente inclusa; Entrambe le pelli incluse; Nessuna pelle inclusa; Pelle risonante inclusa; Altro
bg-BG: Включена е кожа за барабан: Включена ударна кожа; Включени са и двете кожи; Без включени кожи; Включена резонантна кожа; Друго
es: Parche de tambor incluido: Parche batidor incluido; Ambos parches incluidos; Sin parches incluidos; Parche resonante incluido; Otro
nl: Drumvel inbegrepen: Inclusief slagvel; Inclusief beide vellen; Geen vellen inbegrepen; Inclusief resonantievel; Overige
ro-RO: Membrană de tobă inclusă: Față de bătaie inclusă; Ambele fețe incluse; Fără fețe incluse; Față de rezonanță inclusă; Altele
ko: 드럼 헤드 포함: 배터 헤드 포함; 양쪽 헤드 모두 포함; 헤드 미포함; 레조넌트 헤드 포함; 기타
th: รวมหนังกลองมาด้วย: รวมหนังหน้าตี; รวมหนังกลองทั้งสองด้าน; ไม่รวมหนังกลอง; รวมหนังหน้าก้อง; อื่นๆ
ja: ドラムヘッド付き: 打面ヘッド付属; 両方のヘッド付属; ヘッド付属なし; 共鳴面ヘッド付属; その他
cs: Přiložená blána bubnu: Včetně hrací blány; Včetně obou blán; Bez blán; Včetně rezonanční blány; Jiné
sk-SK: Bubnová blana súčasťou balenia: Úderová blana je súčasťou balenia; Obe blany sú súčasťou balenia; Blany nie sú súčasťou balenia; Rezonančná blana je súčasťou balenia; Iné
nb: Trommeskinn inkludert: Slagskinn inkludert; Begge skinn inkludert; Ingen skinn inkludert; Resonansskinn inkludert; Annet
pt-BR: Pele de tambor incluída: Pele batedeira incluída; Ambas as peles incluídas; Nenhuma pele incluída; Pele de resposta incluída; Outros
sl-SI: Priložena glava bobna: Udarna opna vključena; Obe opni vključeni; Opni nista vključeni; Resonančna opna vključena; Drugo
de: Enthaltenes Trommelfell: Inklusive Schlagfell; Beide Felle inklusive; Keine Felle inklusive; Inklusive Resonanzfell; Sonstige
pl: Naciąg perkusyjny w zestawie: Zawiera naciąg uderzany; Zawiera oba naciągi; Nie zawiera naciągów; Zawiera naciąg rezonansowy; Inne
sv: Trumskinn ingår: Slagskinn ingår; Båda skinnen ingår; Inga skinn ingår; Resonansskinn ingår; Övrigt